Hawaii statutes.
[§346G-8] Multifacility
locations. If an entity conducts, operates, or maintains more than one
hospital licensed by the department of health, the entity shall pay the
hospital sustainability fees for each hospital separately, unless it operates
and files more than one hospital under a single medicare cost report. [L 2012,
c 217, pt of §2, §5; am L 2013, c 141, pt of §1, §2; am L 2014, c 123, §2; am L
2015, c 70, §§1(4), 2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next